Massachusetts, session 194th, H2998.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding section 3 of chapter 71 of the acts of 1996, or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the Barnstable county retirement board shall permit Thomas Harmon,
a member of the Barnstable county retirement system, to purchase creditable service for his
military service time pursuant to paragraph (h) of subdivision (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of
the General Laws.
of 1